tests/extascii10.aff
SET CP1251
FULLSTRIP
NEEDAFFIX z
PFX A Y 2
PFX A лыжка сьвіньня лыжка
PFX A лыж шчот лыж
SFX B Y 1
SFX B екар ыжка лекар
SFX C Y 1
SFX C ка 0/ABz ка
PFX X Y 1
PFX X аая бю ааяр
SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y ааа яв/Z ааа
SFX Z Y 1
SFX Z в ргер в
